Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,101
Partition; report of referees; form; contents.

The report of the referee or referees must be in writing signed by at least two of them where more than one has been appointed. It must describe the respective shares with reasonable particularity, and be accompanied by a plat of the premises.

R.S.1867, Code § 834, p. 541;

R.S.1913, § 8317;

C.S.1922, § 9269;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,101;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,101.